hu: Háromlábú/egylábú állvány rögzítési típusa: 1/4; 3/8; Univerzális; Egyéb
bg-BG: Тип закрепване за статив/монопод: 1/4; 3/8; Универсален; Други
sl-SI: Vrsta nastavka za stativ/monopod: 1/4; 3/8; Univerzalno; Drugo
de: Stativ-/Einbeinstativ-Befestigungstyp: 1/4; 3/8; Universell; Sonstiges
es: Tipo de accesorio para trípode/monopié: 1/4; 3/8; Universal; Otros
tr: Tripod/Monopod bağlantı tipi: 1/4; 3/8; Her türden mekana uygun; Diğer
fr: Type de fixation du trépied et monopode: 1/4; 3/8; Universel; Autre
ro-RO: Tip de fixare trepied/monopied: 1/4; 3/8; Universal; Altele
fi: Kolmi-/yksijalkaisen jalustan kiinnitystyyppi: 1/4; 3/8; Yleinen; Muu
cs: Typ uchycení trojnožky/jednonožky: 1/4; 3/8; Univerzální; Jiné
sv: Typ av fäste för stativ/monopod: 1/4; 3/8; Universell; Övrigt
ja: 三脚/一脚アタッチメントタイプ: 1/4; 3/8; ユニバーサル; その他
sk-SK: Typ pripevnenia statívu/monopodu: 1/4; 3/8; Univerzálny; Iné
en: Tripod/Monopod attachment type: 1/4; 3/8; Universal; Other
th: ประเภทอุปกรณ์ยึดของขาตั้งสามขา/ขาตั้งเดี่ยว: 1/4; 3/8; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
ko: 삼각대/모노포드 부착 타입: 1/4; 3/8; 범용; 기타
ru: Тип крепления штатива-треноги/монопода: 1/4; 3/8; Универсальный; Другой
nb: Festetype til trefot/monopod: 1/4; 3/8; Universal; Annet
el: Τύπος προσάρτησης τρίποδου/μονόποδου: 1/4; 3/8; Καθολικής χρήσης; Άλλο
pl: Typ mocowania statywu trójnożnego/jednonożnego: 1/4; 3/8; Uniwersalny; Inne
lt-LT: Trikojo / vienkojo tvirtinimo tipas: 1/4; 3/8; Universalus; Kita
hr-HR: Vrsta priključka za stativ/monopod: 1/4; 3/8; Univerzalno; Ostalo
nl: Type bevestiging statief/monopod: 1/4; 3/8; Universeel; Andere
pt-BR: Tipo de acessório para tripé/monopé: 1/4; 3/8; Universal; Outro
zh-CN: 三脚架/独脚架附件类型: 1/4; 3/8; 通用; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de acessório de tripé/monopé: 1/4; 3/8; Universal; Outro
zh-TW: 三腳架/自拍桿配件類型: 1/4; 3/8; 通用; 其他
vi: Loại phụ kiện giá đỡ ba chân/một chân: 1/4; 3/8; Phổ biến; Khác
da: Stativfastgørelsestype: 1/4; 3/8; Universal; Andet
it: Tipo di attacco treppiede/monopiede: 1/4; 3/8; Universale; Altro